Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,155
Misconduct in office.

Material violation of any provision of sections 71-15,149 to 71-15,157 by a housing agency official shall, unless as otherwise provided in section 71-15,157, constitute misconduct in office.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 84.